Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-151
Department of Correctional Services-made goods; transportation and sale.

Goods produced in whole or in part by persons confined to the department in this state may be transported and sold in the same manner as goods produced by free persons, if persons confined to the department are paid at least minimum wage under state law. The minimum wage requirement does not apply to hobby and craft items produced by persons committed to the department on their own time with their own resources.

Laws 1935, c. 183, § 11, p. 682;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 83-966;

R.S.1943, § 83-151;

Laws 1969, c. 820, § 3, p. 3126;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 73, p. 3108;

Laws 1972, LB 1122, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 309;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 8.

Pursuant to the provisions of this section, any money derived from the sale of a hobby or craft item made by an offender is to be placed in the offender's account and the Department of Corrections may not assess a handling charge against the offender. Randolph v. Dept. of Correctional Services, 205 Neb. 672, 289 N.W.2d 529 (1980).